Washington statutes.
RCW 16.67.051

Designation of positions—Terms.

Commencing on July 1, 1993, the appointive positions on the commission shall be designated as follows: The beef producers shall be designated position one and position six; the dairy (beef) producers shall be designated position two and position seven; the feeders shall be designated position three and position eight; the livestock salesyard operator shall be designated position four; and the meat packer shall be designated position five.

The initial terms of positions one and four shall terminate July 1, 1994; positions two and five shall terminate July 1, 1995; and position three shall terminate July 1, 1996. The initial terms of position six shall terminate July 1, 1998; position seven shall terminate July 1, 1999; and position eight shall terminate July 1, 2000. The regular term of office of subsequent appointees shall be three years from the date of appointment and until their successors are appointed.

[ 1997 c 363 s 2; 1993 c 40 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 40: See note following RCW 16.67.040.